Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 State Transportation Board

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 1215, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “No state agency shall name or rename any state road, bridge, interchange, or any part of a road in honor of, or with the name of, any person unless such action is approved by a joint resolution or Act of the General Assembly which is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval. This Code section shall not apply to a political subdivision of the state naming any road which is under the jurisdiction of such political subdivision.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 32A/SB 465, not codified by the General Assembly, provided for the repeal of Ga. L. 2001, p. 1215, § 2, which section has been codified as and superceded by Code Section 32-4-3, relating to naming state roads, bridges, or interchanges, and which Code section shall remain effective.

32-2-20.
Composition of board; qualifications of members; terms of office; selection of members; filling of vacancies; officers; meetings; compensation.

The State Transportation Board shall be composed of one member to be chosen from each congressional district of the state in the manner provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. Each member of the board shall be a resident of the congressional district which he or she represents. In the event any person who is an officer, agent, official, or employee of the state or of any county, municipality, or other political subdivision thereof or who is a member of the General Assembly is appointed or elected as a member of the board, such person must resign as such officer, agent, official, employee, or member prior to taking office as a member of the board.

Each member shall be elected to serve for a term of five years and until his or her successor is duly elected and certified. The member of the board from each congressional district shall be elected by a majority vote of the members of the House of Representatives and Senate whose respective districts are embraced or partly embraced within such congressional district, meeting in caucus at the regular session of the General Assembly immediately preceding the expiration of the term of office of each such board member. Said caucus shall be called at the state capitol by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate within the first ten days of the convening of the General Assembly in regular session by mailing to the members of the General Assembly who are affected written notice at least four days before the caucus, which notice shall state the time, place, and purpose of said caucus. Within 15 days after each such election, the Speaker of the House and the President of the Senate shall jointly transmit a certificate of such election to the Secretary of State who, upon receipt thereof, shall immediately issue his or her commission thereon, with the great seal of the state affixed thereto. Any member of the board shall be subject to recall at any time by a majority vote of the legislative caucus that elected the member.

In the event that any vacancy for any cause shall occur in the membership of the board during any regular session of the General Assembly, the remainder of the unexpired term shall be filled by a member elected by a majority vote of those members of the General Assembly whose respective districts are embraced or partly embraced within the congressional district where the vacancy occurred, in the same manner as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section for the election of board members. In the event that any vacancy for any cause shall occur in the membership of the board while the General Assembly is not in session, the remainder of the unexpired term shall be filled by a member elected by a majority vote of those members of the General Assembly whose respective districts are embraced or partly embraced within the congressional district where the vacancy occurred, at a meeting which shall be called by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate at some convenient location and in the manner provided in subsection (b) of this Code section for the election of board members.

The board shall, by majority vote of those members present and voting at regular sessions, elect from their number a chairman and vice-chairman who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. In like manner, the board shall also elect a secretary, who need not necessarily be a member of the board, and who shall also serve at the pleasure of the board.

The board shall meet in regular session at least one day each month, at least nine of which regular sessions are to be held at the headquarters of the Department of Transportation in Atlanta, and at such other special meetings as may be called by the commissioner, by the chairman, or by a majority of the members of the board upon reasonable written notice to all members of the board. Further, the chairman of the board or the commissioner is authorized from time to time to call meetings of committees of the board which are established by board policy; and to require the attendance of a member or members of the board at places inside or outside the state when, in the opinion of the chairman or the commissioner, the member or members of the board are needed to attend properly to the department’s business. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business including election or removal of the commissioner. Except as otherwise provided in this title, any power of the board may be exercised by a majority vote of those members present at any meeting at which there is a quorum.

The members of the board shall receive no salary but shall receive for each day of actual attendance at meetings of the board and the committee meetings the per diem and transportation costs prescribed in Code Section 45-7-21. A like sum shall be paid for each day actually spent in studying the transportation needs of the state or attending other functions as a representative of the board, not to exceed 60 days in any calendar year. No per diem shall be paid for meetings of the board conducted by conference call. In addition, they shall receive actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the legal mileage rate for the use of a personal automobile in connection with such attendance and road study. Such per diem and expense shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department upon presentation, by members of the board, of vouchers approved by the chairperson and signed by the secretary.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 242, art. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1921, p. 199, §§ 6, 7; Code 1933, §§ 95-1601, 95-1602, 95-1603, 95-1605; Ga. L. 1950, p. 62, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 31, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 624, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 282, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 151, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1055, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-306, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 11; Ga. L. 1975, p. 833, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1041, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 32; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 2/SB 200; Ga. L. 2010, p. 818, § 1/SB 520; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 32/HB 142.

Cross references.

State Transportation Board, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. IV.

Legal mileage rate, §

50-19-7

.

32-2-21.
Powers and duties of board generally.

The board shall be charged with the general control and supervision of the department. In the exercise of such general control and supervision, the board shall have such duties, powers, and authority as are expressly vested in it by this title, including but not limited to:

Designation of public roads on the state highway system;

Approval of negotiated construction contracts, of authority lease agreements, or of the advertising of nonnegotiated construction contracts; and

Approval of all long-range plans and programs of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 208, § 3; Code 1933, § 95-1606; Ga. L. 1950, p. 62, § 6; Code 1933, § 95A-307, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 3/SB 200.

Cross references.

State Transportation Board, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IV, Sec. IV.

32-2-22.
Definitions; responsibilities of director and Planning Division; approval of program and plan.

As used in this chapter and in Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, the term:

“Director” means the director of planning provided for by Code Section 32-2-43.

“Division” means the Planning Division of the department provided for by paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 32-2-41.

“Metropolitan planning organization” means the forum for cooperative transportation decision making for a metropolitan planning area.

“Metropolitan transportation plan” means the official intermodal transportation plan that is developed and adopted through the metropolitan transportation planning process for a metropolitan planning area.

“Nonmetropolitan area” means a geographic area outside the designated metropolitan planning areas.

“State-wide strategic transportation plan” means the official, intermodal, comprehensive, fiscally constrained transportation plan which includes projects, programs, and other activities to support implementation of the state’s strategic transportation goals and policies. This plan and the process for developing the plan shall comply with 23 C.F.R. Section 450.104.

“State-wide transportation improvement program” means a state-wide prioritized listing of transportation projects covering a period of four years that is consistent with the state-wide strategic transportation plan, metropolitan transportation plans, and transportation improvement programs and required for multi-modal projects to be eligible for funding under Title 23 U.S.C. and Title 49 U.S.C. Chapter 53.

“Transportation improvement program” means a prioritized listing of transportation projects covering a period of four years that is developed and formally adopted by a metropolitan planning organization as part of the metropolitan transportation planning process, consistent with the metropolitan transportation plan, and required for projects to be eligible for funding under Title 23 U.S.C. and Title 49 U.S.C. Chapter 53.

The director and the division shall:

Review and make recommendations to the Governor concerning all proposed regional land transportation plans and transportation improvement programs and negotiate with the propounder of the plans concerning changes or amendments which may be recommended by the department or the Governor, consistent with applicable federal law and regulation;

Review any transportation projects proposed by the department and adopt, remove, or otherwise include such projects as all or a portion of department plans, consistent with applicable federal law and regulation;

Develop the state-wide strategic transportation plan and the state-wide transportation improvement program and support the various transportation improvement programs;

Develop an annual capital construction project list to be reviewed by the Governor and submitted to the General Assembly for consideration in the budget;

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out its duties under the provisions of this title. The division shall report the content of such rules or regulations to the Transportation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives for their approval by majority vote prior to the promulgation thereof; and

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this Code section.

After review and approval by the Governor, the state transportation improvement program and the state-wide strategic transportation plan shall be submitted to the State Transportation Board for approval.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 4/SB 200.